Indiana, session 2026, HB1281.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 2-7-1-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. "Control" means direct or indirect power to
determine, direct, dictate, or decide important matters affecting a
corporation including through:
(1) the ownership of at least twenty percent (20%) of the total
outstanding voting interest in the person;
(2) board representation;
(3) the ability to appoint or discharge any board members,
officers, directors, employees, or contractors; or
(4) proxy voting, a special share, contractual arrangements,
legal obligations or formal or informal arrangements to act in
concert;
for the purpose of controlling or influencing a government of a
foreign country, a state in a foreign country, or a local unit in a
foreign country.
SECTION 2. IC 2-7-1-3.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
2026 IN 1281—LS 7053/DI 107


AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 3.7. "Foreign adversary" includes the following:
(1) The People's Republic of China, and all provinces and
autonomous regions of the People's Republic of China,
including:
(A) the Hong Kong Special Administrative Region of the
People's Republic of China; and
(B) the Macau Special Administrative Region of the
People's Republic of China.
(2) The Republic of Cuba.
(3) The Islamic Republic of Iran.
(4) The Russian Federation.
(5) The Syrian Arab Republic.
(6) The Venezuelan regime of Nicholas Maduro.
(7) An agency or instrumentality of a government listed in
subdivisions (1) through (6).
(8) A person owned or operated in whole or in part by a
foreign government listed in subdivisions (1) through (6).
(9) A person subject to the control of a foreign government
listed in subdivisions (1) through (6).
SECTION 3. IC 2-7-1-3.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 3.8. "Foreign adversary client" means the following:
(1) A current or former official in the executive, legislative,
administrative, military, or judicial branches of a foreign
adversary. The term includes elected and nonelected
individuals.
(2) A current or former official of a foreign political party in
a foreign adversary.
(3) A current or former executive or officer of a foreign
adversary.
(4) A corporation or business that has been formed by or for
the benefit of an individual described in subdivisions (1)
through (3).
(5) A spouse, child, parent, sibling, or spouse's parent of an
individual described in subdivisions (1) through (3).
SECTION 4. IC 2-7-1-10.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 10.7. "Owned or operated in whole or in part"
means:
(1) for a person that is a publicly traded company, a foreign
adversary has:
2026 IN 1281—LS 7053/DI 107


(A) the ability to control the person;
(B) the ability to have access to any material nonpublic
technical information that the person possesses; or
(C) rights or involvement in directing, dictating,
controlling, or participating in the decision making of the
person beyond the abilities of a retail investor holding an
equivalent share of ownership; and
(2) for a person that is a privately held company, a foreign
adversary has any share of the ownership of the person.
SECTION 5. IC 2-7-5-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. A lobbyist may not:
(1) register as a lobbyist for a foreign adversary client; and
(2) contract as a lobbyist to represent a foreign adversary.
SECTION 6. IC 2-7-6-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.149-2016,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) This section does not apply to failure to file
a report or statement under IC 2-7-2-1, IC 2-7-3-1, IC 2-7-3-3.3, or
IC 2-7-3-7 if the person failing to file the report or statement files a late
report or statement not more than ten (10) business days after the
commission notifies the person by certified mail, return receipt
requested, that the person did not file a timely report or statement.
(b) Any person who knowingly or intentionally violates any
provision of IC 2-7-2, IC 2-7-3, or IC 2-7-5 commits unlawful
lobbying, a Level 6 felony. In addition to any penalty imposed on the
defendant under IC 35-50-2-7 for unlawful lobbying, the court may
order the defendant not to engage in lobbying for a period of up to ten
(10) years, IC 2-7-5-6 notwithstanding.
(c) Any person who lobbies in contravention of a court order under
subsection (b) commits a Level 6 felony.
(d) A court may order a person who knowingly or intentionally
violates IC 2-7-5-6.5 to pay a civil penalty equal to the amount of
money that the person received for registering as a lobbyist for a
foreign adversary client or contracting as a lobbyist to represent
a foreign adversary. The clerk of the court shall deposit a civil
penalty collected under this subsection into the state general fund.
2026 IN 1281—LS 7053/DI 107